Illinois, session 104th, SB2813.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5changing Section 5-4.1 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/5-4.1)  (from Ch. 23, par. 5-4.1)7    Sec. 5-4.1. Co-payments prohibited. The Department shall 8not require any recipient of medical assistance under any 9Article of this Code to pay a co-payment for services or 10prescription medications. The Department shall apply for any 11State Plan amendment or federal approval necessary to 12implement this Section, if required. The Department may by 13rule provide that recipients under any Article of this Code 14shall pay a federally approved fee as a co-payment for 15services. No co-payment requirement can exist for renal 16dialysis, radiation therapy, cancer chemotherapy, or insulin, 17and other products necessary on a recurring basis, the absence 18of which would be life threatening, or where co-payment 19expenditures for required services and/or medications for 20chronic diseases that the Illinois Department shall by rule 21designate shall cause an extensive financial burden on the 22recipient, and provided no co-payment shall exist for 23emergency room encounters which are for medical emergencies.   SB2813- 2 -LRB104 16865 KTG 30275 b1The Department shall seek approval of a State plan amendment 2that allows pharmacies to refuse to dispense drugs in 3circumstances where the recipient does not pay the required 4co-payment. Co-payments may not exceed $10 for emergency room 5use for a non-emergency situation as defined by the Department 6by rule and subject to federal approval. 7(Source: P.A. 101-209, eff. 8-5-19.)